Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Community-Based Development Organizations

13-14-201. Creation.

It is the intent of the general assembly to provide for the creation and expansion of economic development efforts by community-based organizations.

Acts 1996, ch. 1032, § 1.

13-14-202. Community-based development organization defined.

A community-based development organization is an organization that:

Is established under the state charter provisions of the Tennessee Code;

Has qualified for tax exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3));

Has a purpose, stated in the articles of incorporation, to serve low and moderate income people's need for community development and community self-help;

Was not organized and is not controlled by governmental entities or agents; and

Was not organized and is not controlled by a for-profit entity or agent.

Acts 1996, ch. 1032, § 2.

13-14-203. Purpose.

A program may be established by this state to build local capacity of community-based organizations to address any or a combination of the following:

Housing needs of people with low or moderate incomes, for home ownership and affordable rental housing, including housing development for the elderly and persons with a disability;

Employment needs of people with low or moderate incomes including job placement with attendant support, small business and entrepreneurship development, and for-profit business development by nonprofit community-based development organizations;

Social service program needs incorporated as a component of community economic development strategies; and

Communications technology to build a network to exchange information and provide technical assistance in the field of community-based economic development.

Acts 1996, ch. 1032, § 3.

13-14-204. Available assistance.

In carrying out this part, any, or a combination of the following, may be provided:

Grants to initiate new community-based development organizations in communities lacking one;

Grants to existing community-based development organizations to extend their capacity to meet the housing and job creation needs of their service area, including staffing and reasonable administrative costs;

Grants to community-based development organizations for strategic planning towards project identification, selection and implementation;

Grants to community-based development organizations for projects that combine community-based social service programs with related jobs for low and moderate income persons to promote community revitalization;

Grants to community-based development organizations for housing development projects to build and renovate single and multi-family housing;

Grants to community-based development organizations for job creation projects which promote small business development by low and moderate income entrepreneurs and nonprofit organizations, for the placement of low income people in jobs with attendant support, and the retention of those jobs; and

Technical assistance to developing community-based development organizations, and existing community-based development organizations to carry out this part. For purposes of this part, technical assistance includes, but is not limited to, training and assisting community-based development organizations with:

Conducting needs assessments;

Training boards of directors;

Staff development training;

Recruiting project development teams;

Determining and applying for available assistance;

Conducting feasibility studies;

Financial planning;

Preparing project budgets;

Proposal writing;

Organizational structure and design;

Generating local support; and

Obtaining legal and accounting advice.

Acts 1996, ch. 1032, § 4.

13-14-205. Preferences in granting assistance.

In carrying out this part, preference shall be given to community-based development organizations that:

Serve a geographic area or a population of individuals effectively marginalized due to its small numbers, high ratio of African-American residents, persistent poverty, disability or other factors which effectively result in structural disinvestment; and

Can demonstrate support from the community, particularly the community which will directly benefit from the development efforts.

Acts 1996, ch. 1032, § 5.

13-14-206. Authority to implement rules.

Rules may be developed by the state to carry out this part, including rules to define “persons of low and moderate income.”

Acts 1996, ch. 1032, § 6.

13-14-207. Authority.

Nothing in this part shall limit the authority or powers of community-based development organizations currently authorized under the law.

Acts 1996, ch. 1032, § 7.

13-14-208. Administrative expenses.

Any grant program authorized under this part to support the creation and expansion of economic development efforts by community-based organizations shall authorize the community-based development organization to utilize up to five percent (5%) of the funds for the administration of the grant program, including, but not limited to, accounting expenses associated with the grant program, not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

Acts 1997, ch. 249, § 1.